Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2388.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Common Cents Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." A department, bureau, board or other body created by the laws of this Commonwealth."Municipal authority." A body or board authorized to enact ordinances or adopt resolutions on behalf of a municipality and that:(1) provides natural or artificial gas, electricity or <--1234567891011121314151617 steam for the production of light, heat or power to or for the public for compensation;(2) diverts, develops, pumps, impounds, distributes or furnishes water to or for the public for compensation; or(3) provides wastewater collection, treatment or disposal for the public for compensation."Physical legal tender." Coins, banknotes and other currency recognized as legal tender under 31 U.S.C. § 5103 (relating to legal tender)."Political subdivision." A county, city, borough, township, town or school district with taxing jurisdiction in a defined geographic area within this Commonwealth."Public utility." A person that owns or operates in this Commonwealth equipment or facilities for:(1) producing, generating, transmitting, distributing or furnishing natural or artificial gas, electricity or steam for the production of light, heat or power to or for the public for compensation;(2) diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing or furnishing water to or for the public for compensation; or(3) wastewater collection, treatment or disposal for the public for compensation.Section 3. Physical legal tender transactions rounding.(a) Rounding required.--A political subdivision, Commonwealth agency, municipal authority or public utility that accepts face-to-face, in-person sales or collections of physical legal tender in this Commonwealth shall determine the total price of collections in the following manner:(1) Collections shall be totaled with any discount or 20260HB2388PN3542 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deduction.(2) If one cent, two cents, six cents or seven cents is at the end of the total sum, the sum shall be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by five for those individuals paying with physical legal tender.(3) If three cents, four cents, eight cents or nine cents is at the end of the total sum, the sum shall be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by five for those individuals paying with physical legal tender.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a payment method utilizing a payment other than physical legal tender, such as a check, debit card, credit card or electronic or digital payment.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE.THIS ACT SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMON CENTS ACT.SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"COLLECTION." THE EXCHANGE OF PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER IN CONNECTION WITH ANY LAWFUL TRANSACTION TO SATISFY THE GRAND TOTAL OBLIGATION."COMMONWEALTH AGENCY." A DEPARTMENT, BUREAU, BOARD OR OTHER BODY CREATED BY THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH."ENTITY." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE SAME MEANING AS 15 PA.C.S. § 102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS). THE TERM INCLUDES PUBLIC UTILITIES AS DEFINED IN 66 PA.C.S. § 102 (RELATING TO 20260HB2388PN3542 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEFINITIONS) AND A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP."GRAND TOTAL." THE TOTAL OF A PRODUCT, GOODS OR SERVICES RENDERED, INCLUDING ANY DISCOUNTS, DEDUCTIONS AND ADDITION TO SALES TAX, SURCHARGES AND FEES."MICROTRANSACTION." ANY TRANSACTION WHERE THE GRAND TOTAL IS BELOW 5¢."MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY." A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE CREATED UNDER 53 PA.C.S. CH. 56 (RELATING TO MUNICIPAL AUTHORITIES)."PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER." COINS, BANKNOTES AND OTHER CURRENCY RECOGNIZED AS LEGAL TENDER UNDER 31 U.S.C. § 5103 (RELATING TO LEGAL TENDER)."POLITICAL SUBDIVISION." A COUNTY, CITY, BOROUGH, TOWNSHIP, INCORPORATED TOWN OR SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH TAXING JURISDICTION IN A DEFINED GEOGRAPHIC AREA WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 3. PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER TRANSACTIONS ROUNDING.A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY, ENTITY, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION THAT ACCEPTS FACE-TO-FACE, IN-PERSON SALES OR COLLECTIONS OF PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER IN THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL DETERMINE THE TOTAL DUE AT THE TIME OF COLLECTION BY A CUSTOMER OR RATEPAYER. ALL GRAND TOTALS SHALL BE COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THE FOLLOWING PROCEDURES:(1) IF THE GRAND TOTAL ENDS IN 1¢, 2¢, 6¢ OR 7¢, THE GRAND TOTAL SHALL BE ROUNDED DOWN TO THE NEAREST AMOUNT DIVISIBLE BY FIVE.(2) IF THE GRAND TOTAL ENDS IN 3¢, 4¢, 8¢ OR 9¢, THE GRAND TOTAL SHALL BE ROUNDED UP TO THE NEAREST AMOUNT DIVISIBLE BY FIVE.SECTION 4. MICROTRANSACTIONS.MICROTRANSACTIONS THAT HOLD A GRAND TOTAL OF 1¢, 2¢, 3¢ OR 4¢ SHALL BE ROUNDED UP TO THE NEAREST NICKEL.20260HB2388PN3542 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 5. EXCEPTION.SECTIONS 3 AND 4 SHALL NOT APPLY TO A PAYMENT METHOD UTILIZING A PAYMENT OTHER THAN PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER, SUCH AS A CHECK, DEBIT CARD, CREDIT CARD, GIFT CARDS, STORE VALUE CARDS, GIFT CERTIFICATES, CONTACTLESS PAY OR ELECTRONIC OR DIGITAL PAYMENT. THIS ACT SHALL NOT APPLY TO A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY, ENTITY, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY, POLITICAL SUBDIVISION THAT CAN PROVIDE EXACT CHANGE OR TRANSACTIONS THAT ARE PAID WITH THE EXACT PHYSICAL LEGAL TENDER TO SATISFY THE AMOUNT OF THE GRAND TOTAL.SECTION 6. ACCOUNT CREDITING.A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY, ENTITY, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL APPLY A ROUNDING-UP CREDIT TO THE CUSTOMER OR RATEPAYER'S ACCOUNT BALANCE UNDER SECTION 3(2). A GRAND TOTAL UNDER SECTION 3(1) SHALL BE CONSTITUTED AS THE BILL BEING PAID IN FULL.SECTION 7. LIMITED LIABILITY.A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY, ENTITY, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION THAT UTILIZES THE ROUNDING PROCEDURE SHALL NOT CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, NO.387), KNOWN AS THE UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES AND CONSUMER PROTECTION LAW.SECTION 8. EFFECT ON TAX.THIS ACT SHALL NOT AFFECT THE IMPOSITION, COMPUTATION, COLLECTION, PAYMENT, REPORTING, REMITTING OR LIABILITY OF TAX DUE UNDER ARTICLE II OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971. THE IMPOSITION AND COMPUTATION OF TAX DUE SHALL TAKE PLACE PRIOR TO THE GRAND TOTAL BEING CALCULATED AND ROUNDED.SECTION 9. APPLICABILITY.20260HB2388PN3542 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY, ENTITY, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL, AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE BUT NOT LATER THAN ONE YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, ADHERE TO THE PROCEDURE SPECIFIED UNDER THIS ACT. THIS ACT SHALL APPLY TO THE ACT OF MAY 25, 1945 (P.L.1050, NO.394), KNOWN AS THE LOCAL TAX COLLECTION LAW.SECTION 10. EFFECTIVE DATE.THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2388PN3542 - 6 - 12345678